Florida, session 2026, SB154.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 11 456.0145, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 456.0145âMobile Opportunity by Interstate Licensure 13 Endorsement (MOBILE) Act.â 14 (2)âLICENSURE BY ENDORSEMENT.â 15 (c)âA person is ineligible for a license under this section 16 if he or she: 17 1.âHas a complaint, an allegation, or an investigation 18 pending before a licensing entity in another state, the District 19 of Columbia, or a possession or territory of the United States; 20 2.âHas been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to, 21 regardless of adjudication, any felony or misdemeanor related to 22 the practice of a health care profession; 23 3.âHas had a health care provider license revoked or 24 suspended by another state, the District of Columbia, or a 25 territory of the United States, or has voluntarily surrendered 26 any such license in lieu of having disciplinary action taken 27 against the license; or 28 4.âHas been reported to the National Practitioner Data 29 Bank, unless the applicant has successfully appealed to have his 30 or her name removed from the data bank. If the reported adverse 31 action was a result of conduct that would not constitute a 32 violation of any law or rule in this state, the board, or the 33 department if there is no board, may: 34 a.âApprove the application; 35 b.âApprove the application with restrictions on the scope 36 of practice of the licensee; 37 c.âApprove the application with placement of the licensee 38 on probation for a period of time and subject to such conditions 39 as the board, or the department if there is no board, may 40 specify, including, but not limited to, requiring the applicant 41 to submit to treatment, attend continuing education courses, or 42 submit to reexamination; or 43 d.âDeny the application; or 44 5.âIs seeking licensure to practice under chapter 466 and 45 has not graduated from a dental school or dental hygiene college 46 or school accredited by the American Dental Association 47 Commission on Dental Accreditation or its successor entity, if 48 any, or any other dental or dental hygiene program accrediting 49 entity recognized by the United States Department of Education. 50 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.